Utah statutes.
17-50-322.   County funding for a fixed guideway.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "fixed guideway" means a public transit facility that uses and occupies:

(a)  rail for the use of public transit; or

(b)  a separate right-of-way for the use of public transit.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a county legislative body may not levy a property tax or expend revenues from uniform fees or any tax or fee imposed in lieu of a property tax, to purchase, erect, repair, rebuild, maintain, or otherwise fund a fixed guideway.

(b)  Subsection (2)(a) does not apply to a property tax levy imposed by a county for the purpose of paying for bonds if:

(i)  before January 1, 2007, the bonds were issued or approved by voters for issuance to fund a fixed guideway; and

(ii)  the county does not impose a sales and use tax authorized by Section 59-12-2217.



Amended by Chapter 263, 2010 General Session

